Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 3 Examination, Treatment, etc., for Mental Illness

Cross references.

Mental incompetency and dependency for juveniles, T. 15, C. 11, A. 4.

Plea in criminal case that defendant was insane or mentally incompetent at time act committed or is mentally incompetent to stand trial, §

17-7-130

et seq.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, T. 30, C. 5.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

Licensing of applied psychologists, T. 43, C. 39.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.

Adult crisis stabilization units, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, Chapter 82-3-1.

Children and adolescent crisis stabilization units, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State or Georgia, Department of Behavioral Health and Disabilities, Chapter 82-4-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Signing into Heaven: Zinermon v. Burch, Federal Rights, and State Remedies Thirty Years After Monroe v. Pape,” see 40 Emory L.J. 1 (1991).

For note on commitment and release of persons found not guilty by reason of insanity, see 15 Ga. L. Rev. 1065 (1981).

For comment, “Having an Affair May Shorten Your Life: The Ashley Madison Suicides,” see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 455 (2017).